Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
NOTICE OF PENDENCY OF ACTION

§634-51 Recording of notice of pendency of
action. [(a)] In any action concerning real property or affecting the
title or the right of possession of real property, the plaintiff, at the time
of filing the complaint, and any other party at the time of filing a pleading
in which affirmative relief is claimed, or at any time afterwards, may record
in the bureau of conveyances a notice of the pendency of the action, containing
the names or designations of the parties, as set out in the summons or
pleading, the object of the action or claim for affirmative relief, and a
description of the property affected thereby. From and after the time of
recording the notice, a person who becomes a purchaser or encumbrancer of the property
affected shall be deemed to have constructive notice of the pendency of the
action and be bound by any judgment entered therein if the person claims
through a party to the action; provided that in the case of registered land,
section 501-151, sections 501-241 to 501-248, and part II of chapter 501 shall
govern.

[(b)] This section authorizes the recording of
a notice of the pendency of an action in a United States District Court, as
well as a state court. [L 1927, c 73, §1; RL 1935, §4086; RL 1945, §10068; RL
1955, §230-42; am L 1966, c 33, §4; HRS §634-76; am L 1972, c 89, §2A(p); ren
HRS §634-51; gen ch 1985; am L 1998, c 219, §14; am L 2009, c 120, §14; am L
2013, c 119, §9]

Law Journals and Reviews

Concerning constitutionality of lis pendens statutes, see
Dealing with the Remorseful Seller: Time Being of the Essence and Buyer's
Right to Specific Performance in Hawaii Real Estate Transactions. 15 HBJ, no.
2, at 77 (1980).

Case Notes

Since filing notice of lis pendens under this section poses
only a potential cloud on title, it is not an unconstitutional seizure of
property without due process. 418 F. Supp. 695 (1976).

Action in which plaintiff made fraudulent transfer claims
under the Hawaii Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act (chapter 651C), seeking to
avoid the transfer of real property to the extent necessary to satisfy
plaintiff's claims and/or to grant plaintiff other relief under §651C-7(a), was
an appropriate subject of a lis pendens under the Hawaii doctrine of lis
pendens, codified in this section. 457 F. Supp. 2d 1121 (2006).

Where plaintiffs filed a notice of pendency of action
pursuant to this section and §501-151, magistrate judge's order, in applying
Sports Shinko to the facts of the case to deny defendant's motion to expunge,
was not clearly erroneous or contrary to law. 529 F. Supp. 2d 1206 (2007).

Party may not invoke lis pendens where party's interest in
land is only a percentage of the income derived from the use of land and there
is no right to title or control of the land. 72 H. 267, 814 P.2d 396 (1991).

Alleged equitable lien and filing of lis pendens not breach
of covenant against encumbrances since lien was not actually in existence,
valid, and enforceable at time of conveyance; a recorded lis pendens is an encumbrance.
75 H. 480, 866 P.2d 951 (1994).

Where complainant does not claim title to or a right of
possession of property, section not implicated and lis pendens should have been
expunged. 75 H. 480, 866 P.2d 951 (1994).

Where trial court's judgment in favor of defendant
extinguished any claims plaintiff had against defendant and filing of appeal
did not affect validity of the judgment being appealed from, lis pendens
properly expunged as it was no longer based on "any action concerning real
property". 92 H. 243, 990 P.2d 713 (1999).

Where mortgagors' rights to property extinguished through
foreclosure, that issue is res judicata. 4 H. App. 439, 667 P.2d 834 (1983).

Where appellants filed both of their motions for notice of
pendency of action after the decree of foreclosure, after the order confirming
the foreclosure sale was entered, and after the writ of possession had been
issued by the court in favor of the bank, the sale of the property to a third
party rendered the appeal of the expungement of the lis pendens moot. 117 H.
506 (App.), 184 P.3d 821 (2008).

Where developer did not seek to directly obtain title to, or
possession of, property, but rather sought to avoid the transfer of the
property owner’s and lessee’s interest in the property for the purpose of
securing payment of money which might potentially be owed if developer
succeeded on its counterclaims, the developer’s claim under chapter 651C, the
Hawaii Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act, was asserted for a purpose which was
rejected as a basis for a lis pendens under this section; thus, circuit court
did not abuse its discretion in granting county’s motion to expunge developer’s
lis pendens. 128 H. 378 (App.), 289 P.3d 1014 (2012).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next